Vermont, session 2025-2026, S25.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 9454 is amended to read:
§ 9454. HOSPITALS; DUTIES
(a) Hospitals shall file the following information at the time and place and
in the manner established by the Board:
* * *
(6) known depreciation schedules on existing buildings, a four-year
capital expenditure projection, and a one-year capital expenditure plan; and
(7) the number of employees of the hospital whose duties are primarily
administrative in nature, as defined by the Board, and the number of
employees whose duties primarily involve delivering health care services
directly to hospital patients;
(8) information regarding base salaries and total compensation for the
hospital’s executive and clinical leadership and for its employees who deliver
health care services directly to hospital patients; and
(9) such other information as the Board may require.
(b) Hospitals shall adopt a fiscal year that shall begin on October 1.
VT LEG #379258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.25
2025 Page 3 of 5
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 9456 is amended to read:
§ 9456. BUDGET REVIEW
(a) The Board shall conduct reviews of each hospital’s proposed budget
based on the information provided pursuant to this subchapter and in
accordance with a schedule established by the Board.
(b) In conjunction with budget reviews, the Board shall:
* * *
(12) review the hospital’s investments in workforce development
initiatives, including nursing workforce pipeline collaborations with nursing
schools and compensation and other support for nurse preceptors; and
(13) consider the salaries for the hospital’s executive and clinical
leadership and the hospital’s salary spread, including a comparison of median
salaries to the medians of northern New England states and a comparison of
the base salaries and total compensation for the hospital’s executive and clinic
leadership with those of the hospital’s lowest-paid employees who deliver
health care services directly to hospital patients; and
(14) consider the number of employees of the hospital whose duties are
primarily administrative in nature, as defined by the Board, compared with the
number of employees whose duties primarily involve delivering health care
services directly to hospital patients, as well as national average staffing ratios
VT LEG #379258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.25
2025 Page 4 of 5
for hospitals of a similar size and with a similar number of locations and
industry best practices for such hospital staffing ratios.
(c) Individual hospital budgets established under this section shall:
(1) be consistent with the Health Resource Allocation Plan;
(2) take into consideration national, regional, or in-state peer group
norms, according to indicators, ratios, and statistics established by the Board,
and ensure that the ratio of administrative employees at each hospital to
employees delivering health care services directly to patients is aligned with
national averages for a hospital of a similar size and with a similar number of
locations;
(3) promote efficient and economic operation of the hospital;
(4) reflect budget performances for prior years;
(5) include a finding that the analysis provided in subdivision (b)(9) of
this section is a reasonable methodology for reflecting a reduction in net
revenues for non-Medicaid payers; and
(6) demonstrate that they support equal access to appropriate mental
health care that meets standards of quality, access, and affordability equivalent
to other components of health care as part of an integrated, holistic system of
care; and
(7) limit the base salaries and total compensation for the hospital’s
executive and clinic leadership to not more than 10 times that of the hospital’s
VT LEG #379258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.25
2025 Page 5 of 5
lowest-paid employees who deliver health care services directly to hospital
patients.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026 and shall apply to hospital
budgets for fiscal years 2027 and after.
VT LEG #379258 v.1